apertium-cym.cym.dix
    <pardef n="medd__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ech</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>af</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wch</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dyl/u__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ech</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aswn</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asit</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asai</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asem</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asech</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asent</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asid</l>
          <r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="byw__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="oes__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="g/eni__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eni</l>
          <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enir</l>
          <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anwyd</l>
          <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e.e.__abbr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="abbr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ni__vpart">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>ni<s n="vpart"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nid</l>
          <r>ni<s n="vpart"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>ni</l>
          <r>ni<s n="vpart"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/na__vpart">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>na<s n="vpart"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nad</l>
          <r>na<s n="vpart"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>na</l>
          <r>na<s n="vpart"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>na<s n="vpart"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nac</l>
          <r>na<s n="vpart"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>na</l>
          <r>na<s n="vpart"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="a__vpart">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vpart"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/oni__vpart">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>oni</l>
          <r>oni<s n="vpart"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>onid</l>
          <r>oni<s n="vpart"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oni</l>
          <r>oni<s n="vpart"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="fe__vpart">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vpart"/><s n="aff"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/yr__vpart">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>yr</l>
          <r>yr<s n="vpart"/><s n="aff"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yr</l>
          <r>yr<s n="vpart"/><s n="aff"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>yr<s n="vpart"/><s n="aff"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="ni"><i/><par n="/ni__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i/><par n="/na__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="a__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="oni"><i/><par n="/oni__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="fe"><i>fe</i><par n="fe__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="yr"><i/><par n="/yr__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="mi"><i>mi</i><par n="fe__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="a__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="oes"><i>oes</i><par n="oes__vbser"/><p><l><b/>angen</l><r><g><b/>angen</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="byw"><par n="initial-b"/><i>yw</i><par n="byw__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="oes"><i>oes</i><par n="oes__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="does"><p><l>does</l><r>ni<s n="vpart"/><s n="neg"/><j/>oes</r></p><par n="oes__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="dyna"><i>dyna</i><par n="oes__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="dyma"><i>dyma</i><par n="oes__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="geni"><par n="initial-g"/><i></i><par n="g/eni__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="medd"><par n="initial-m"/><i>edd</i><par n="medd__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="e.e."><i>e.e.</i><par n="e.e.__abbr"/></e>
